Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 218

Assignment

48-218-101. Assignment of financial rights.

Assignment of Financial Rights Permitted. Except as provided in subsection (c), a member's financial rights are transferable in whole or in part.

Effect of Assignment of Financial Rights. An assignment of a member's financial rights entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the share of profits and losses and the distributions to which the assignor would otherwise be entitled. An assignment of a member's financial rights does not dissolve the LLC and does not entitle or empower the assignee to become a member, to cause a dissolution, to exercise any governance rights, or, except as specifically provided by chapters 201-248 of this title, to receive any notices from the LLC, or to cause dissolution. The assignment may not allow the assignee to control the member's exercise of governance rights, and any attempt to do so shall be null and void.

Restrictions on Assignment of Financial Rights.

A restriction on the assignment of financial rights may be imposed in the articles, in the operating agreement, by a written resolution adopted by the members, or by a written agreement among, or other written action by, members, or among them and the LLC.

A restriction on the assignment of financial rights referenced in subdivision (c)(1) that is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances is enforceable against the owner of the restricted financial rights. A written restriction on the assignment of financial rights that is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances and is noted in the articles or operating agreement may be enforced against a successor or transferee of the owner of the restricted financial rights, including a pledgee or a legal representative, whether or not such successor or transferee of the owner had actual notice thereof. Unless noted in the articles or operating agreement, a restriction, even though permitted by this section, is ineffective against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-218-102. Assignment of a membership interest or governance rights.

Transfer of Membership Interests Restricted. A member may assign the member's full membership interest only by assigning all of the member's governance rights coupled with an assignment to the same assignee of all the member's financial rights. A member's governance rights are assignable only as provided in this section. A member or holder of a financial right has no power to assign all or any part of the member's membership interest or financial rights, except as provided in § 48-218-101 and this section.

Consents Required.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or the operating agreement, a member may, without the consent of any other member, assign governance rights to another member.

Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2)(B) and (C), any other assignment of any governance rights is effective only if all the members, other than the member seeking to make the assignment, approve the assignment by unanimous consent or if the articles or operating agreement so permit, if the assignment is approved in accordance with § 48-232-102. The consent of a member may be evidenced in any manner specified in the articles or operating agreement, but in the absence of such specification, consent shall be evidenced by a written instrument, dated and signed by such person. The giving of consent is at the discretion of the consenting party and may be unreasonably withheld.

If the articles or operating agreement so provide, the governors who are members may approve, by a majority or greater in number of the nonassigning governors who are members, the assignment of governance rights to a nonmember. In the event there are no nonassigning governors who are members, the assignment must be approved by unanimous consent of the governors or, if the articles or operating agreement so permit, the assignment shall be approved by at least a majority vote of the members exclusive of the member seeking to make the assignment.

Pursuant to § 48-232-102(a), if permitted in the articles or operating agreement, the governance rights associated with membership interests or classes of membership interests may be assigned without the consent of the members or the governors who are members.

Effect on Membership. When an assignment of governance rights is effective under subsection (b):

The assignee becomes a member, if not already a member;

If the assignor does not retain any governance rights, the assignor ceases to be a member, and the consent required under subsection (b), shall, if applicable, also constitute the consent to avoid dissolution that would otherwise result under § 48-245-101(a)(5); and

An assignee who has become a member has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a member under the articles, any operating agreement and chapters 201-248 of this title.

Effect on Liability for Contributions and Illegal Distributions. When an assignment is effective under subsection (a):

The assignee is liable for any obligations of the assignor under § 48-232-101 existing at the time of transfer, except to the extent that, at the time the assignee became a member, the liability was unknown to the assignee, and could not be ascertained from the required records of the LLC;

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), the assignee shall not be liable for the obligations of the assignor under § 48-237-101; and

The assignor is not released from liability to the LLC for obligations of the assignor existing at the time of transfer under §§ 48-232-101 and 48-237-101.

Pledge of Membership Interest. Unless otherwise provided in the articles or an operating agreement, the pledge of, or granting of a security interest, lien or other encumbrance in or against, any or all of the membership interest of a member is not an assignment and shall not cause the member to cease to be a member or to cease to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member.

Consequences of Ineffective Assignment. If any purported or attempted assignment of governance rights is ineffective for failure to obtain the consent required in subsection (b):

The purported or attempted assignment is ineffective in its entirety; and

Any assignment of financial rights that accompanied the purported or attempted assignment of governance rights is void.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, §§ 25-27; 1999, ch. 455, §§ 13-15.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

48-218-103. Consensual restrictions on assignment of governance rights.

In addition to restrictions set forth in this chapter, restrictions on the assignment of governance rights may be imposed in accordance with the procedures and under the same conditions as stated in § 48-218-101(c), for restricting the assignment of financial rights.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 28.

48-218-104. Effective date of assignments.

Any permissible assignment of financial rights under § 48-218-101 and of governance rights under § 48-218-102 will be effective as to and binding on the LLC only when the assignee's name, address, social security or taxpayer identification number and the nature and extent of the assignment are reflected in the required records of the LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-218-105. Rights of judgment creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a member, the court may charge such person's financial rights with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of such person's financial rights under § 48-218-101. This section does not deprive any member or assignee of financial rights of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the membership interest. This section is the sole and exclusive remedy of a judgment creditor with respect to the judgment debtor's membership interest.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.